Utah statutes.
38-9-3.   County recorder may reject wrongful lien within scope of
employment -- Good faith requirement.
(1) (a)  A county recorder may reject recording of a lien if the county
recorder determines the lien is a wrongful lien as defined in Section 38-9-1.
(b)  If the county recorder rejects a document to record a lien in accordance
with Subsection (1)(a), the county recorder shall immediately return the
original document together with a notice that the document was rejected
pursuant to this section to the person attempting to record the document or to
the address provided on the document.
(2)  A county recorder who, within the scope of the county recorder's
employment, rejects or accepts a document for recording in good faith under
this section is not liable for damages.
(3)  If a rejected document is later found to be recordable pursuant to a
court order, it shall have no retroactive recording priority.
(4)  Nothing in this chapter shall preclude any person from pursuing any
remedy pursuant to Utah Rules of Civil Procedure, Rule 65A, Injunctions.
